North Carolina, session 2025, SB787.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Part 1 of Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-81.66. Artificial intelligence instruction.
(a) The State Board of Education shall adopt standards for age-appropriate instruction on
artificial intelligence (AI) for kindergarten through grade 12. The standards shall include at least
the following:
(1) The basic concepts of artificial intelligence, including an age-appropriate
understanding of how AI systems source and create content.
(2) Real-world applications of AI.
(3) Economic, legal, and social issues surrounding the use of information
provided by AI.
(4) Responsible, ethical use of AI, including the following topics:
a. Privacy.
b. Oversight.
c. Academic dishonesty.
d. The effect of human bias on AI models.
(b) The standards adopted by the State Board may allow for AI instruction pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section to be included in the standards for computer science courses offered
in middle school and high school."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in recurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to provide support to schools providing instruction pursuant to
G.S. 115C-81.66, as enacted by this act. The Department shall distribute funds to each public
school unit on the basis of average daily membership.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies beginning with
the 2026-2027 school year.
*S787-v-1*